NLP - Project/maithili/maithili-val.dix
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ॊऀABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"       c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="sg"       c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="pl"       c="Plural"/>
    <sdef n="m"       c="Masculine"/>   
    <sdef n="f"       c="Feminine"/>   
    <sdef n="o"       c="Oblique"/>
    <sdef n="d"       c="Direct"/>
    <sdef n="p3"       c="Third Person"/>
    <sdef n="p2"       c="Second Person"/>
    <sdef n="p1"       c="First Person"/>
    <sdef n="eo"       c="Emphasis with only"/>
    <sdef n="adj"		c="Adjective"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
	<pardef n = "balika">
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>ain</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "ladZki">
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>an</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "bAlak">
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>ein</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "Gare">
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>Msaba</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "ladZikahi">
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>saBa</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "rAj">
	  <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>ahisaBa</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "Karce">
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>saBa</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "sonare">
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>saBa</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "kuve">
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>saBa</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "kavie">
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>saBa</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "Axamie">
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>saBa</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "sawrue">
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>saBa</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "allue">
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>saBa</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "suve">
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>saBa</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "harahuze">
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>saBa</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "kroXe/kroXahi/kroXahiz">
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "sarisoMe">
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>saBa</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "lakaToe">
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>saBa</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "gosaiMe">
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>saBa</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "Garave">
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>saBa</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
